Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-285
Cancellation of registration; effect.

A foreign limited partnership may cancel its registration by filing with the Secretary of State a certificate of cancellation signed and sworn to by a general partner together with a fee as set forth in section 67-293. A cancellation does not terminate the authority of the Secretary of State to accept service of process for the foreign limited partnership with respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 53;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 81;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 55.